src/liblouis/tables/sw-ke-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Swahili (Kenya) Grade 2
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-index-name: Swahili, contracted, grade 2
#-display-name: Swahili grade 2 contracted braille
#
#-author: Jake Kyle
#-author: Dipendra Manocha
#-author: Martin Kieti
#-maintainer: Jake Kyle <jake@compassbraille.org>
#-updated: 2022
#
#+language:sw
#+region:sw-KE
#+type:literary
#+grade:2
#+contraction: full
#
#-copyright: 2022, Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
#-copyright: 2022, the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Copyright (C) 2022 by Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
# Copyright (C) 2022 by the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#
# With contributions from DAISY Consortium under project supported by Microsoft.
#
# This table was created using information contained in a document entitled
# "Kenya Swahili Braille Code" (see <http://liblouis.org/braille-specs/swahili/>)
# which was derived from the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development's Swahili
# Braille Manual: “Mwongozo wa Breli Ya Kiswahili”.
#
# The Braille code is graded into 6 grades: 1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 and 2. This is
# in line with the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development’s Curriculum
# Designs for Kiswahili Braille. 
#
# The Braille code in the document was adopted at a Stakeholders Workshop held
# at the Swiss Lenana Mount Hotel on 25th August 2022.
#

# FIXME: as a workaround for https://github.com/liblouis/liblouis/issues/1288
# we have replaced the line "include sw-ke-g1-5.ctb" with the contents of sw-ke-g1-5.ctb
# include sw-ke-g1-5.ctb

##### begin of sw-ke-g1-5.ctb

include sw-ke-g1-4.ctb
midendword ote 46-15 46e
midendword enye 56-15 56e
midendword ond 46-145 46d
midendword ong 56-1245 56g
midendword lia 46-123 46l
midendword lea 56-123 56l

##### end of sw-ke-g1-5.ctb

# Word Contractions
# These contractions are created when the word is standing alone. The word can be
# preceeded or followed by a punctuation. If the word contraction consists of
# characters that can be contracted, the character contraction also applies. 

word afadhali 1-124-2346 afdh
word ahadi 1-125-145 ahd
word alama 1-123-134 alm
word amani 1-134 am
word anwani 1-1345-2456 anw
word asante 1-234 as
word asubuhi 1-234-12 asb
word baadaye 12-145-13456 bdy
word badala 12-145-123 bdl
word bahati 12-125-2345 bht
word barabara 12-1235-12 brb
word barua 12-1235 br
word barua-pepe 12-1235-1234 brp
word basi 12-234 bs
word bila 12-123 bl
word bonyeza 12-12456-1356 bnyz
word bwana 12-2456 bw
word chakula 16-13-123 chkl
word cheti 16-2345 cht
word chini 16-1345 chn
word chora 16-1235 chr
word chumba 16-1346 chmb
word daftari 145-124-2345 dft
word daima 145-134 dm
word dakika 145-13 dk
word daktari 145-13-2345 dkt
word darasa 145-1235-234 drs
word dawati 145-2456-2345 dwt
word desturi 145-234-2345 dst
word dijitali 145-245-2345 djt
word dirisha 145-1235-146 drsh
word dogo 145-1245 dg
word dondoo 145-1246 dnd
word ekari 15-13-1235 ekr
word elektroniki 15-123-13-2345 elkt
word elimu 15-123 el
word eneo 15-1345 en
word eropleni 15-1235-1234 erp
word fafanua 124-124-1345 ffn
word fahamu 124-125-134 fhm
word faida 124-145 fd
word fedha 124-2346 fdh
word fimbo 124-1346 fmb
word fulani 124-123-1345 fln
word furaha 124-1235-125 frh
word gani 1245-1345 gn
word gari 1245-1235 gr
word gazeti 1245-1356-2345 gzt
word ghasia 126-234 ghs
word ghafla 126-124-123 ghfl
word gharama 126-1235-134 ghrm
word hasa 125-234 hs
word habari 125-12-1235 hbr
word hadithi 125-145-1456 hdth
word haja 125-245 hj
word hakuna 125-13-1345 hkn
word halafu 125-123-124 hlf
word haraka 125-1235-13 hrk
word harakati 125-1235-13-2345 hrkt
word haramu 125-1235-134 hrm
word hasara 125-234-1235 hsr
word hatari 125-2345-1235 htr
word hekima 125-13-134 hkm
word hesabu 125-234-12 hsb
word heshima 125-146-134 hshm
word himiza 125-134-1356 hmz
word hisabati 125-234-12-2345 hsbt
word hospitali 125-234-1234-2345 hspt
word hoteli 125-2345-123 htl
word huru 125-1235 hr
word ibuka 24-12-13 ibk
word imara 24-134-1235 imr
word ishara 24-146-1235 ishr
word ingawa 24-346-2456 ingw
word isipokuwa 24-234-1234-13 ispk
word itifaki 24-2345-124-13 itfk
word itikadi 24-2345-13-145 itkd
word jumla 245-134-123 jml
word jamhuri 245-134-125-1235 jmhr
word jawabu 245-2456-12 jwb
word jemedari 245-134-145-1235 jmdr
word jeshi 245-146 jsh
word jimbo 245-1346 jmb
word jinsia 245-1345-234 jns
word juhudi 245-125-145 jhd
word jukumu 245-13-134 jkm
word jumlisha 245-134-123-146 jmlsh
word jumuia 245-134 jm
word kazi 13-1356 kz
word kabati 13-12-2345 kbt
word kabisa 13-12-234 kbs
word kama 13-134 km
word kamati 13-134-2345 kmt
word kanisa 13-1345-234 kns
word karatasi 13-1235-2345-234 krts
word karibu 13-1235-12 krb
word kaskazini 13-234-13-1356 kskz
word kati 13-2345 kt
word katika 13-2345-13 ktk
word kidato 13-145-2345 kdt
word kijana 13-245-1345 kjn
word kila 13-123 kl
word kipakatalishi 13-1234-13-2345-146 kpktsh
word kitabu 13-2345-12 ktb
word kuliko 13-123-13 klk
word kusini 13-234-1345 ksn
word kwa\smfano 12345-134-124 qmf
word kwamfano 12345-134-124 qmf - in case without space
word labda 123-12-145 lbd
word lahaja 123-125-245 lhj
word lakini 123-13-1345 lkn
word lawama 123-2456-134 lwm
word lazima 123-1356-134 lzm
word lingana 123-346-1345 lngn
word linganisha 123-346-1345-146 lngnsh
word lugha 123-126 lgh
word mbali 1346-123 mbl
word madhumuni 134-2346-134-1345 mdhmn
word magharibi 134-126-12 mghb
word mahali 134-125-123 mhl
word maisha 134-146 msh
word mara 134-1235 mr
word mashariki 134-146-13 mshk
word mbalimbali 1346-123-1346 mblmb
word mfano 134-124 mf
word mjadala 134-245-145-123 mjdl
word moja 134-245 mj
word mpira 134-1234-1235 mpr
word msichana 134-234-16 msch
word msikiti 134-234-13-2345 mskt
word mtandao 134-2345-1246 mtnd
word muhimu 134-125-134 mhm
word nafasi 1345-124-234 nfs
word namna 1345-134-1345 nmn
word nini 1345-1345 nn
word nukta 1345-13-2345 nkt
word omba 135-1346 omb
word okoa 135-13 ok
word ogopa 135-1245-1234 ogp
word ofisi 135-124-234 ofs
word omboleza 135-1346-123-1356 omblz
word pamoja 1234-134-245 pmj
word pasipo 1234-234-1234 psp
word peleleza 1234-123-1356 plz
word pole 1234-123 pl
word polepole 1234-123-1234 plp
word refu 1235-124 rf
word rafiki 1235-124-13 rfk
word raha 1235-125 rh
word ramani 1235-134-1345 rmn
word raslimali 1235-234-123 rsl
word ratiba 1235-2345-12 rtb
word runinga 1235-1345-346 rnng
word rununu 1235-1345-1345 rnn
word sana 234-1345 sn
word sababu 234-12-12 sbb
word salamu 234-123-134 slm
word samahani 234-134-125-1345 smhn
word sambaza 234-134-12-1356 smbz
word sasa 234-234 ss
word sawa 234-2456 sw
word sawasawa 234-2456-234 sws
word sehemu 146-134 shm
word serikali 234-1235-13-123 srkl
word shabaha 146-12-125 shbh
word shughuli 146-126-123 shghl
word shukkrani 146-13-1235-1345 shkrn
word siku 234-13 sk
word simu 234-134 sm
word taratibu 2345-1235-2345 trt
word tafadhali 2345-124-2346 tfdh
word tarakilishi 2345-1235-13-146 trksh
word tarehe 2345-1235-125 trh
word tayari 2345-13456-1235 tyr
word teknolojia 2345-13-1345-245 tknj
word tena 2345-1345 tn
word thamani 1456-134-1345 thmn
word tofauti 2345-124-2345 tft
word tovuti 2345-1236-2345 tvt
word ukurasa 136-13-1235 ukr
word ujamaa 136-245-134 ujm
word umoja 136-134-245 umj
word upesi 136-1234-234 ups
word utandawazi 136-2345-1345-145-1356 utndz
word uhuru 136-125-1235 uhr
word vijana 1236-245-1345 vjn
word vema 1236-134 vm
word vile 1236-123 vl
word vilevile 1236-123-1236 vlv
word virusi 1236-1235-234 vrs
word vitabu 1236-2345-12 vtb
word vizuri 1236-1356-1235 vzr
word vuguvugu 1236-1245-1236 vgv
word wasiwasi 2456-234-2456 wsw
word wakati 2456-13-2345 wkt
word wakili 2456-13-123 wkl
word wala 2456-123 wl
word walakini 2456-123-13-1345 wlkn
word wimbo 2456-1346 wmb
word yaliyomo 13456-123-134 ylm
word yaani 13456-1345 yn
word yamkini 13456-134-13 ymk
word yule 13456-123 yl
word yuleyule 13456-123-13456 yly
word zima 1356-134 zm
word zaidi 1356-145 zd
word zamani 1356-134-1345 zmn
word zawadi 1356-2456-145 zwd

# Abbreviations that could be confused with word contractions.
contraction yn # for name 'Yohani'

# -- end of table --
